Utah statutes.
77-38-9.   Representative of victim -- Court designation -- Representation
in cases involving minors -- Photographs in homicide cases.
(1) (a)  A victim of a crime may designate, with the approval of the court, a
representative who may exercise the same rights that the victim is entitled to
exercise under this chapter.
(b)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the victim may revoke the
designation at any time.
(c)  In cases where the designation is in question, the court may require that
the designation of the representative be made in writing by the victim.
(2)  In cases in which the victim is deceased or incapacitated, upon request
from the victim's spouse, parent, child, or close friend, the court shall
designate a representative or representatives of the victim to exercise the
rights of a victim under this chapter on behalf of the victim. The responsible
prosecuting agency may request a designation to the court.
(3) (a)  If the victim is a minor, the court in its discretion may allow the
minor to exercise the rights of a victim under this chapter or may allow the
victim's parent or other immediate family member to act as a representative of
the victim.
(b)  The court may also, in its discretion, designate a person who is not a
member of the immediate family to represent the interests of the minor.
(4)  The representative of a victim of a crime shall not be:
(a)  the accused or a person who appears to be accountable or otherwise
criminally responsible for or criminally involved in the crime or conduct, a
related crime or conduct, or a crime or act arising from the same conduct,
criminal episode, or plan as the crime or conduct is defined under the laws of
this state;
(b)  a person in the custody of or under detention of federal, state, or local
authorities; or
(c)  a person whom the court in its discretion considers to be otherwise
inappropriate.
(5)  Any notices that are to be provided to a victim pursuant to this chapter
shall be sent to the victim or the victim's lawful representative.
(6)  On behalf of the victim, the prosecutor may assert any right to which the
victim is entitled under this chapter, unless the victim requests otherwise or
exercises his own rights.
(7)  In any homicide prosecution, the prosecution may introduce a photograph
of the victim taken before the homicide to establish that the victim was a
human being, the identity of the victim, and for other relevant purposes.
